test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONG_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imakomiiishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imakomiiishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imakomiiishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imakomiiishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imakomiiishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imakomiiishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imakomiiishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imakomiiishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imakomiiishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imakomiiishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imakomiiishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imakomiiishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makomiiensimishinaaniban
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makomiiensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makomiiensimishiwaaiban
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makomiiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makomiiensimishiniiban
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makomiiensimishini***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makomiienhimishinaaniban
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makomiienhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makomiienhimishiwaaiban
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makomiienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makomiienhimishiniiban
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makomiienhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiiensimishinaanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiiensimishinaanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiiensimishinaaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makomiiensimishiwaaan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makomiiensimishiwaaag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makomiiensimishiwaaing
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makomiiensimishinian
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makomiiensimishiniag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makomiiensimishiniing
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiienhimishinaanan
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiienhimishinaanag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiienhimishinaaning
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makomiienhimishiwaaan
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makomiienhimishiwaaag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makomiienhimishiwaaing
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makomiienhimishinian
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makomiienhimishiniag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makomiienhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: makomiiensimishibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: makomiiensimishibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: makomiiensimishibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensimish***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensimish***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensimish***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: makomiienhimishibanan
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: makomiienhimishibanag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: makomiienhimishibaning
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhimish***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhimish***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiiensiminaanibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiiensiminaanibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiiensiminaanibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiiensimiwaaibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiiensimiwaaibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiiensimiwaaibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiiensiminiibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiiensiminiibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiiensiminiibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensimini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensimini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensimini***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiienhiminaanibanan
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiienhiminaanibanag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiienhiminaanibaning
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiienhimiwaaibanan
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiienhimiwaaibanag
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiienhimiwaaibaning
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiienhiminiibanan
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiienhiminiibanag
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiienhiminiibaning
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhimini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhimini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiiensishinaanibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiiensishinaanibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiiensishinaanibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiiensishiwaaibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiiensishiwaaibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiiensishiwaaibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiiensishiniibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiiensishiniibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiiensishiniibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensishini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensishini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensishini***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiienhishinaanibanan
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiienhishinaanibanag
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiienhishinaanibaning
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiienhishiwaaibanan
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiienhishiwaaibanag
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiienhishiwaaibaning
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiienhishiniibanan
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiienhishiniibanag
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiienhishiniibaning
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhishini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhishini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiiimishinaanibanan
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiiimishinaanibanag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiiimishinaanibaning
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiiimishiwaaibanan
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiiimishiwaaibanag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiiimishiwaaibaning
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiiimishiniibanan
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiiimishiniibanag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiiimishiniibaning
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiiimishini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiiimishini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiiimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimakomiiensimishinaaniban
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimakomiiensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimakomiiensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimakomiiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimakomiiensimishiniiban
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimakomiiensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimakomiienhimishinaaniban
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimakomiienhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimakomiienhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimakomiienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimakomiienhimishiniiban
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimakomiiensimishinaaniban
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimakomiiensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimakomiiensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimakomiiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimakomiiensimishiniiban
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimakomiiensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimakomiienhimishinaaniban
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimakomiienhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimakomiienhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimakomiienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimakomiienhimishiniiban
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omakomiiensimishinaaniban
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omakomiiensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omakomiiensimishiwaaiban
